Utah statutes.
11-13-217.   Control and operation of joint facility or improvement provided by agreement.

Any facility or improvement jointly owned or jointly operated by any two or more public agencies or acquired or constructed pursuant to an agreement under this chapter may be operated by any one or more of the interested public agencies designated for the purpose or may be operated by a joint board or commission or an interlocal entity created for the purpose or through an agreement by an interlocal entity and a public agency receiving service or other benefits from such entity or may be controlled and operated in some other manner, all as may be provided by appropriate agreement. Payment for the cost of such operation shall be made as provided in any such agreement.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 286, 2002 General Session

